Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1849
Victim; duty.

To receive the notices provided for in sections 81-1848 to 81-1848.02, a victim shall keep the county attorney informed of his or her current address and telephone number.

Laws 1990, LB 87, § 10;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 510;

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 15.